Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-2715
License; suspend or revoke; grounds; applicant or licensee; demonstrate compliance with law.

(1) If a licensee does not continue to meet the qualifications or satisfy the requirements that apply to an applicant for a new money transmission license, the director may suspend or revoke the licensee's license in accordance with the procedures established by the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or other applicable state law for such suspension or revocation.

(2) An applicant shall demonstrate that the applicant meets or will meet, and a licensee shall at all times meet, the requirements of sections 8-2730, 8-2731, and 8-2732.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 15;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 20.